Wisconsin, session 2025, SB376.
do enact as follows:SB376,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (a) 15. of the statutes is amended to read:SB376,2,7271.05 (6) (a) 15. The amount of the credits computed under s. 71.07 (2dm), 3(2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), (5i), (5j), (5k), 4(5r), (5rm), (6n), (8s), and (10) and not passed through by a partnership, limited 5liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 6partnership’s, company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under s. 71.21 (4) or 771.34 (1k) (g).SB376,28Section 2. 71.07 (8s) of the statutes is created to read:SB376,2,10971.07 (8s) Additional employer-provided child care credit. (a) 10Definitions. In this subsection:SB376,2,13111. “Claimant” means a person who is eligible for and claims the federal 12employer-provided child care credit for the taxable year to which the claim under 13this subsection relates.SB376,2,15142. “Federal employer-provided child care credit” means the tax credit under 15section 45F of the Internal Revenue Code.SB376,2,2016(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, a 17claimant may claim as a credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02, up to the 18amount of those taxes, an amount equal to the amount of the federal employer-19provided child care credit claimed by the claimant on his or her federal income tax 20return for the taxable year to which the claim under this subsection relates.SB376,3,41(c) Limitations. 1. The credit under this subsection may not be claimed for 2any amount of the federal employer-provided child care credit claimed for any 3expenditure paid or incurred for a child care facility located outside this state or for 4services provided outside this state.SB376,3,952. A claimant who claims a credit under this subsection and whose federal 6income tax is increased under section 45F (d) of the Internal Revenue Code shall 7add to the claimant’s liability for taxes imposed under s. 71.02, an amount equal to 8the amount that the claimant’s federal income tax is increased under section 45F 9(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.SB376,3,1110(d) Administration. Section 71.28 (4) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit under 11s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.SB376,312Section 3. 71.10 (4) (cu) of the statutes is created to read:SB376,3,141371.10 (4) (cu) Additional employer-provided child care credit under s. 71.07 14(8s).SB376,415Section 4. 71.21 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB376,3,191671.21 (4) (a) The amount of the credits computed by a partnership under s. 1771.07 (2dm), (2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), 18(5g), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), (8s), and (10) and passed through to partners 19shall be added to the partnership’s income.SB376,520Section 5. 71.26 (2) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB376,4,22171.26 (2) (a) 4. Plus the amount of the credit computed under s. 71.28 (1dm), 22(1dx), (1dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (5g), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), 23(5rm), (6n), (8s), and (10) and not passed through by a partnership, limited liability 24company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 1partnership’s, limited liability company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under 2s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).SB376,63Section 6. 71.28 (8s) of the statutes is created to read:SB376,4,5471.28 (8s) Additional employer-provided child care credit. (a) 5Definitions. In this subsection:SB376,4,861. “Claimant” means a person who is eligible for and claims the federal 7employer-provided child care credit for the taxable year to which the claim under 8this subsection relates.SB376,4,1092. “Federal employer-provided child care credit” means the tax credit under 10section 45F of the Internal Revenue Code.SB376,4,1511(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, a 12claimant may claim as a credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.23, up to the 13amount of those taxes, an amount equal to the amount of the federal employer-14provided child care credit claimed by the claimant on his or her federal income tax 15return for the taxable year to which the claim under this subsection relates.SB376,4,1916(c) Limitations. 1. The credit under this subsection may not be claimed for 17any amount of the federal employer-provided child care credit claimed for any 18expenditure paid or incurred for a child care facility located outside this state or for 19services provided outside this state.SB376,4,24202. A claimant who claims a credit under this subsection and whose federal 21income tax is increased under section 45F (d) of the Internal Revenue Code shall 22add to the claimant’s liability for taxes imposed under s. 71.23, an amount equal to 23the amount that the claimant’s federal income tax is increased under section 45F 24(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.SB376,5,21(d) Administration. Subsection (4) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit under 2sub. (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.SB376,73Section 7. 71.30 (3) (cu) of the statutes is created to read:SB376,5,5471.30 (3) (cu) Additional employer-provided child care credit under s. 71.28 5(8s).SB376,86Section 8. 71.34 (1k) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB376,5,10771.34 (1k) (g) An addition shall be made for credits computed by a tax-option 8corporation under s. 71.28 (1dm), (1dx), (1dy), (3), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), 9(3wm), (3y), (4), (5), (5g), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), (8s), and (10) and passed 10through to shareholders.SB376,911Section 9. 71.45 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes is amended to read:SB376,5,181271.45 (2) (a) 10. By adding to federal taxable income the amount of credit 13computed under s. 71.47 (1dm) to (1dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3w), (3y), (5g), (5i), 14(5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), (8s), and (10) and not passed through by a partnership, 15limited liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to 16the partnership’s, limited liability company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income 17under s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g) and the amount of credit computed under s. 71.47 18(3), (3t), (4), (4m), and (5).SB376,1019Section 10. 71.47 (8s) of the statutes is created to read:SB376,5,212071.47 (8s) Additional employer-provided child care credit. (a) 21Definitions. In this subsection:SB376,5,24221. “Claimant” means a person who is eligible for and claims the federal 23employer-provided child care credit for the taxable year to which the claim under 24this subsection relates.SB376,6,212. “Federal employer-provided child care credit” means the tax credit under 2section 45F of the Internal Revenue Code.SB376,6,73(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, a 4claimant may claim as a credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.43, up to the 5amount of those taxes, an amount equal to the amount of the federal employer-6provided child care credit claimed by the claimant on his or her federal income tax 7return for the taxable year to which the claim under this subsection relates.SB376,6,118(c) Limitations. 1. The credit under this subsection may not be claimed for 9any amount of the federal employer-provided child care credit claimed for any 10expenditure paid or incurred for a child care facility located outside this state or for 11services provided outside this state.SB376,6,16122. A claimant who claims a credit under this subsection and whose federal 13income tax is increased under section 45F (d) of the Internal Revenue Code shall 14add to the claimant’s liability for taxes imposed under s. 71.43, an amount equal to 15the amount that the claimant’s federal income tax is increased under section 45F 16(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.SB376,6,1817(d) Administration. Section 71.28 (4) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit under 18s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.SB376,1119Section 11. 71.49 (1) (cu) of the statutes is created to read:SB376,6,212071.49 (1) (cu) Additional employer-provided child care credit under s. 71.47 21(8s).SB376,6,2222